Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska80-322.01
Department of Veterans' Affairs Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The Department of Veterans' Affairs Cash Fund is created. The fund shall include any transfers by the Legislature, any gifts, grants, bequests, contributions, or donations received by the department, and money transferred pursuant to section 80-322. The department shall administer the fund. Disbursements from the fund shall be used by the department for the purposes of supporting veteran services, carrying out the duties and functions of the department, paying administrative costs of the department, or for the specific purposes designated by acceptance of any gift, grant, bequest, contribution, or donation. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2017, LB340, § 11;

Laws 2024, LB252, § 2.
July 19, 2024
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.